Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2763.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-47-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-47 entitled "Motor
Vehicle Reparations Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-47-18. Automobile liability insurance rates.
Any general or public law to the contrary notwithstanding, the commissioner shall, after
consulting with all insurers licensed to write automobile liability insurance in this state, promulgate
regulations which provide that automobile liability insurance rates shall not take into account the
credit history or credit score of the applicant for insurance, but shall only take into account the past
claim experience of the applicant for the insurance and incorporate the principles used in so called
“merit rating” or “experience rating” rate plans which are now in effect in other states.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005598
========